Tennessee, session 114, SB0507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-135-103(1), is amended by
deleting "the National Propane Gas Association" and substituting "state or national associations
representing the liquified petroleum industry".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0507
001173
- 1 -